Louisiana, session 2026, SB388.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 14:112.14 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§112.14. Effective date
This Subpart shall become effective on August 1, 2026.
Section 2. R.S. 39:1602.3 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1602.3. State contracts; review for foreign adversaries and foreign terrorist
organizations
The division of administration is authorized to review all state contracts
to determine if they are held by:
(1) A foreign adversary as defined in R.S. 3:3614.
(2) A foreign terrorist organization as designated by the United States
secretary of state in accordance with Section 219 of the United States
Immigration and Nationality Act, Section 40 of the United States Arms Export
Control Act, or Section 620(A) of the United States Foreign Assistance Act of
1961.
(3) The agents of a foreign adversary or of a foreign terrorist
organization.
Section 3. Section 4 of Act No. 670 of the 2024 Regular Session of the Legislature
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 388 ENROLLED
is hereby repealed.
Section 4. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.